Utah statutes.
20A-3-306.   Voting ballot -- Returning ballot.

(1) (a)  To vote a mail-in absentee ballot, the absentee voter shall:

(i)  complete and sign the affidavit on the envelope;

(ii)  mark the votes on the absentee ballot;

(iii)  place the voted absentee ballot in the envelope;

(iv)  securely seal the envelope; and

(v)  attach postage, unless voting in accordance with Section 20A-3-302, and deposit the envelope in the mail or deliver it in person to the election officer from whom the ballot was obtained.

(b)  To vote an absentee ballot in person at the office of the election officer, the absent voter shall:

(i)  complete and sign the affidavit on the envelope;

(ii)  mark the votes on the absent-voter ballot;

(iii)  place the voted absent-voter ballot in the envelope;

(iv)  securely seal the envelope; and

(v)  give the ballot and envelope to the election officer.

(2)  An absentee ballot is not valid unless:

(a)  in the case of an absentee ballot that is voted in person, it is applied for and cast in person at the office of the appropriate election officer no later than the Friday before election day; or

(b)  in the case of a military-overseas ballot, submitted in accordance with Section 20A-16-404.



Amended by Chapter 309, 2012 General Session

